Maryland, session 2025, HB0313.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
13–619.3.
(a) The Administration shall develop and make available for qualifying vehicles
a specially designed vintage reproduction registration plate.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0313*

HOUSE BILL 313
(b) The owner of a vehicle, or a lessee of the vehicle under a lease not intended as
security, or a director, an officer, an employee, or a partner of a business entity that owns
the vehicle considered eligible by the Administration may apply to the Administration for
a registration plate under this section if the vehicle is included in one of the following
classes:
(1) A Class A (passenger) vehicle;
(2) A Class E (truck) vehicle with a manufacturer’s rated capacity of 1 ton
or less;
(3) A Class L (historic) vehicle;
(4) A Class M (multipurpose) vehicle; or
(5) A Class N (street rod) vehicle.
(c) (1) In addition to the annual registration fee otherwise required under this
title, an owner of a vehicle assigned a registration plate under this section shall pay [when
initially issued the registration plate and each time the registration plate is renewed:
(1) A fee set by the Administration to recover the Administration’s costs
under this section; and
(2) A fee set by the Administration to be credited to the Gasoline and Motor
Vehicle Revenue Account for distribution under § 8–403 or § 8–404 of this article]:
(I) $100 WHEN INITIALLY ISSUED THE REGISTRATION PLATE;
AND
(II) $25 EACH TIME THE REGISTRATION PLATE IS RENEWED.
(2) FEES COLLECTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE:
(I) USED TO RECOVER THE ADMINISTRATION’S COSTS UNDER
THIS SECTION; AND
(II) CREDITED TO THE GASOLINE AND MOTOR VEHICLE
REVENUE ACCOUNT FOR DISTRIBUTION UNDER § 8–403 OR § 8–404 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(d) The special registration plate issued under this section shall[:
(1) Be available for sale for 1 year from the date of initial issuance; and

HOUSE BILL 313 3
(2) Resemble] RESEMBLE the black lettering on yellow background
registration plate issued by the State for display on a motor vehicle in 1910.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.